Wyoming, session 2025, HB0066.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 15-9-301 is created to read:

ARTICLE 3
ABANDONED AND NUISANCE PROPERTIES
HB0066

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0011

15-9-301. Abandoned and nuisance properties.

(a) The governing body of a city or town may
designate a property within the limits of the city or town
as abandoned or as a nuisance for the purposes of this
section if the property has been vacant for not less than
six (6) months or if the property has been neglected and
contains a significantly deteriorated or deteriorating
structure as determined by the governing body. The
governing body of a city or town with less than fifteen
thousand (15,000) residents shall not have more than three
(3) properties designated as abandoned or as a nuisance at
the same time. The governing body of a city or town with
not less than fifteen thousand (15,000) and not more than
fifty thousand (50,000) residents shall not have more than
six (6) properties designated as abandoned or as a nuisance
at the same time. The governing body of a city or town with
not less than fifty thousand and one (50,001) residents
shall not have more than ten (10) abandoned or nuisance
properties designated as abandoned or as a nuisance at the
same time. Nothing in this section shall be construed to
HB0066

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0011
require the owner of an abandoned or nuisance property to
sell the property.

(b) In determining whether a property is abandoned
under subsection (a) of this section, a city or town shall
examine the property and determine whether the property is
occupied by the property owner or by permission of the
property owner. In determining whether a property is a
nuisance under subsection (a) of this section, a city or
town shall consider whether an unreasonable or unlawful use
or condition of the property has resulted or may result in
an economic or physical injury to a neighboring property
owner or endangers the life, health or safety of the
community.

(c) If the owner of an abandoned or nuisance property
makes an expenditure to demolish the property and remove
all demolished material within two (2) years after the
property is designated as abandoned or as a nuisance under
subsection (a) of this section and submits proof of the
expenditure to the governing body of the city or town for
approval under subsection (f) of this section, the owner
shall be eligible for a tax credit as provided in W.S.
HB0066

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0011
39-13-109(d)(ii) in an amount not to exceed fifty percent
(50%) of the expenditures to demolish the property and
remove all demolished material.

(d) If the owner of an abandoned or nuisance property
makes an expenditure to bring the property into substantial
compliance with applicable codes within two (2) years after
the property is designated as abandoned or as a nuisance
under subsection (a) of this section and submits proof of
the expenditure to the governing body of the city or town
for approval under subsection (f) of this section, the
owner shall be eligible for a tax credit as provided in
W.S. 39-13-109(d)(ii) in an amount not to exceed the amount
expended to bring the property into substantial compliance
with applicable codes.

(e) Any person who purchases or takes ownership of an
abandoned or nuisance property after the property has been
designated as abandoned or as a nuisance under subsection
(a) of this section and who demolishes the property and
removes all demolished material or brings the property into
substantial compliance with applicable codes within five
(5) years after the person initially purchased or took
HB0066

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0011
ownership of the property shall be eligible for a tax
credit as provided in W.S. 39-13-109(d)(ii) in an amount
not to exceed the amount expended to demolish the property
and remove all demolished material or bring the property
into substantial compliance with applicable codes.

(f) Prior to being eligible for any tax credit under
subsections (c) through (e) of this section, the person
claiming the credit shall document the person's
expenditures resulting from the actions required by
subsections (c) through (e) of this section and submit
proof of the expenditures to the governing body of the city
or town for approval. Only approved expenditures shall be
eligible for a tax credit. The governing body shall not
approve any expenditures that do not directly relate to the
actions required by subsections (c) through (e) of this
section. The governing body shall not approve any
expenditures made after the applicable time limit specified
in subsections (c) through (e) of this section. The
governing body shall submit any approved expenditures to
the department of revenue as provided in W.S.
39-13-109(d)(ii).

HB0066

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0011
Section 2. W.S. 15-1-103(a) by creating a new
paragraph (li) and 39-13-109(d) by creating a new paragraph
(ii) are amended to read:

15-1-103. General powers of governing bodies.

(a) The governing bodies of all cities and towns may:

(li) Assess abatement costs and create liens in
the same manner as a special assessment pursuant to W.S.
15-6-401 through 15-6-426 against real property on which
nuisances are abated under paragraph (xix) of this
subsection or on which dangerous property or enclosures are
repaired, removed or destroyed pursuant to paragraph (xxvi)
of this subsection. A lien for abatement costs assessed
under this paragraph shall not have preference over
preexisting indebtedness but shall have priority from and
after the date of filing or recording.

39-13-109. Taxpayer remedies.

(d) Credits. The following shall apply:

HB0066

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0011
(ii) The following shall apply to the abandoned
and nuisance property tax credit provided by W.S. 15-9-301:

(A) A property owner who improves
designated abandoned or nuisance property as provided in
W.S. 15-9-301 may apply for a property tax credit in the
amount approved by the governing body of the city or town
under W.S. 15-9-301(c) through (f). A property owner
applying for a property tax credit under this paragraph
shall submit a certificate from the city or town that
designated the property as abandoned or as a nuisance under
W.S. 15-9-301(a) attesting that the property is eligible
for the credit and attesting to the amount of the credit
approved by the city or town. The credit shall be
applicable only against future tax payments, for a period
not to exceed ten (10) years, on the designated property
that is improved by the taxpayer. No refund of taxes shall
be authorized due to a credit under this paragraph;

(B) A person claiming a credit under this
paragraph may reserve a credit to use in a later tax year,
provided that the person shall not be entitled to use any
credit more than ten (10) years after the person is first
HB0066

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0011
eligible for the tax credit under W.S. 15-9-301(c) through
(e);

(C) A property owned by the same person
shall not be eligible for more than one (1) credit under
this paragraph in any ten (10) year period.

Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0066